Illinois, session 104th, HB3131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Advancing Federally Regulated Illinois Transmission Projects 6Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 8finds that federally regulated interconnection procedures 9delay and impair infrastructure necessary for the resilience, 10reliability, and clean energy transition envisioned in Public 11Act 102-662 (the "Climate and Equitable Jobs Act") and other 12Acts. The General Assembly further finds that the State's 13leading role in quantum computing, data centers, battery 14manufacturing, and other new economic initiatives requires 15resilient and reliable electric systems. The General Assembly 16further finds that the Department is uniquely situated to 17reduce those delays and impairments for specific electricity 18transmission infrastructure located partially or wholly within 19the Illinois footprint of PJM Interconnection, L.L.C. by 20initiating and managing on behalf of the State the State 21Agreement Approach for transmission expansion that addresses 22Illinois public policy requirements. The General Assembly 23finds that the health, welfare, and prosperity of residents of   HB3131- 2 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1the State is furthered by the Department pursuing the State 2Agreement Approach for projects that meet the resilience, 3reliability, and clean energy goals of the Climate and 4Equitable Jobs Act. 5    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 6    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission. 7    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity. 9    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity. 11    "FERC" means the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. 12    "PJM Operating Agreement" means the Amended and Restated 13Operating Agreement of PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., as may be 14amended from time to time, or its successor. 15    "PJM" means PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its successor. 16    "Project" means a proposed or existing electric 17transmission line wholly or in part within the Illinois 18footprint of PJM. 19    "State Agreement Approach" or "SAA" means the State 20Agreement Approach process for the development and allocation 21of costs for transmission expansion projects that address 22State public policy requirements as described in Section 1.5.9 23of Schedule 6 of the PJM Operating Agreement, as may be amended 24from time to time, or its successor.   HB3131- 3 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1    Section 15. Initiation. The Department is authorized to 2identify one or more Projects for potential application of the 3PJM State Agreement Approach that the Director determines may 4improve the resilience, reliability, and access to clean 5energy of the ratepayers of a public utility with more than 63,000,000 customers in this State. The Director may consider 7any information that the Director determines is relevant, 8including studies or reports regarding the expected impact of 9Projects. Upon identification of such a Project by the 10Director, the Department shall enter into an agreement on 11behalf of the State with the owner of the Project reflecting 12the intent of the State to have the Project participate in the 13PJM State Agreement Approach, for cooperation between the 14Project and the Department, and for exchange of information 15including appropriate protocols for confidential, proprietary, 16and critical infrastructure information. The agreement may 17provide for reimbursement of reasonable costs incurred by the 18Department under the agreement or under Section 20 of this 19Act. 20    Prior to entering into an agreement with any other Project 21under the terms of this Section, the Department shall enter 22into a contract with a Project that meets the following 23criteria: 24        (1) more than 75 miles of transmission line from the 25    Project will be built on easements or rights-of-way of 26    existing infrastructure, including railroad   HB3131- 4 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1    rights-of-way, municipal rights-of-way or highway 2    rights-of-way within the State; 3        (2) more than 80 miles of transmission line from the 4    Project will be built underground within the State; 5        (3) the portion of the Project within the State will 6    meet the definition of a high voltage direct current 7    transmission facility once built; 8        (4) the Project connects 2 or more regional 9    transmission organizations; and 10        (5) the Project will transmit electricity at on the 11    high voltage direct current transmission facility at a 12    design voltage of 500 kV or greater. 13    Section 20. Applications. Upon execution of the agreement 14identified in Section 15 of this Act by the Department and the 15owner of the Project, the Department shall inform PJM in a 16manner consistent with PJM's Operating Agreement, of the 17Department's intention to pursue the SAA for the Project on 18behalf of the State. If and only if the Project does not 19require the use of eminent domain within the State pursuant to 20Section 8-509 of the Public Utilities Act or otherwise under 21law, the Department shall explicitly state in such notice that 22the Project is not subject to competitive bidding. The notice 23to PJM shall include an affirmative statement that the costs 24of the Project will be borne by Illinois ratepayers. 25    Following the initial notice and application to PJM, the   HB3131- 5 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1Department shall make such filings and prepare and provide 2such documents and other materials, or assist PJM with such 3filings, documents, or information, or participate in such 4hearings, meetings, or other communications as may be 5necessary or helpful in facilitating PJM's use of the SAA to 6allocate the costs of the Project using a FERC-accepted cost 7allocation proposed by the Department to recover costs from 8customers within the State, including a proposal for 9allocating the costs of the Project under PJM's tariffs, as 10may be modified from time to time, and entering into 11agreements with PJM as appropriate to implement the SAA for 12the Project. Such cost allocation proposed by the Department 13to PJM for acceptance by FERC shall provide that all costs 14related to the Project shall be recovered from customers 15located in the State of Illinois and may not include customers 16in any other state unless such other state voluntarily agrees 17to be responsible for such cost allocation. The Department 18shall coordinate with the Project as necessary. 19    Section 25. Department filings. The Department shall make 20such filings and prepare and provide such documents and other 21materials for FERC and PJM as may be reasonably necessary to 22qualify generators utilizing the Project as a capacity 23resource with PJM, as defined under PJM's tariffs, as may be 24modified from time to time.   HB3131- 6 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1    Section 900. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 2Section 8-406.3 as follows: 3    (220 ILCS 5/8-406.3 new)4    Sec. 8-406.3. State Agreement Approach. 5    (a) The General Assembly finds that development and 6operation of interregional electric transmission facilities 7can substantially improve the resilience and reliability of 8the bulk electric system and substantially advance the public 9policy goals of this State, including implementation of Public 10Act 102-0662 and subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of 11subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 12Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act. The 13General Assembly further finds that the health, welfare, and 14prosperity of all Illinois residents is advanced by 15transmission projects that improve resilience, reliability, 16and access to clean energy and that the Commission has the 17authority to issue a certificate of public convenience and 18necessity under Section 8-406 of this Article to such 19transmission projects. However, the General Assembly further 20finds that in order to advance such transmission projects 21through federal approvals not directly regulated by the 22Commission or the State, the State can and should utilize 23available tools to simplify and streamline federal processes 24to obtain federal approval for electric transmission projects 25issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity under   HB3131- 7 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1Section 8-406 of this Act, such as the State Agreement 2Approach offered by PJM Interconnection, L.L.C.3    (b) As used in this Section:4    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity.6    "PJM" means PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its successor.7    "PJM Operating Agreement" means the Amended and Restated 8Operating Agreement of PJM Interconnection, L.L.C. as may be 9amended from time to time or its successor.10    "Project" means a proposed or existing electric 11transmission line wholly or in part within the Illinois 12footprint of PJM that meets the criteria set forth in Section 1315 of the Advancing Federally Regulated Illinois Transmission 14Projects Act.15    "State Agreement Approach" or "SAA" means the State 16Agreement Approach process for the development and allocation 17of costs for transmission expansion projects that address 18State public policy requirements as described in Section 1.5.9 19of Schedule 6 of the PJM Operating Agreement as may be amended 20from time to time or its successor.21    (c) For any applicant for a certificate of public 22convenience and necessity under Section 8-406 of this Article 23seeking permission to construct, own, or operate a Project:24        (1) The applicant, with its initial submission to the 25    Commission under subsection (b) of Section 8-406 of this 26    Article, may include a statement from the Department that   HB3131- 8 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1    the Department has or plans to submit the Project to PJM 2    for inclusion under the SAA.3        (2) If the applicant does not hold a certificate of 4    service authority as a public utility with the Commission, 5    the Commission shall accept the statement from the 6    Department as prima facie evidence that the Project is and 7    will be for public use.8        (3) In evaluating the requirements of subsection (d) 9    of Section 8-406, the Commission shall evaluate whether 10    the Project is a reasonable method of developing, 11    constructing, and operating an electric transmission 12    facility with the same technology, attributes, location 13    and purpose as the Project while ensuring adequate safety, 14    reliability, and environmental benefit.15        (4) In the final order granting the certificate of 16    public convenience and necessity for the Project, the 17    Commission shall explicitly:18            (A) state that the Project is intended and 19        expected to participate in the PJM SAA; and20            (B) require that, if the Project enters into a 21        contract to provide services to one or more customers, 22        revenue from those contracts shall be disclosed to the 23        Commission annually on a confidential basis and, 24        consistent with and to the maximum extent allowable by 25        law, that revenue shall offset costs otherwise 26        recoverable from Illinois ratepayers.   HB3131- 9 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1        (5) The Commission shall grant a certificate of 2    service authority for applicant as a public utility and a 3    certificate of public convenience and necessity as 4    described in Section 8-406 except that if the applicant 5    does not seek authority pursuant to Section 8-509 of this 6    Article:7            (A) Subsections (h) and (i) of Section 8-406 do 8        not apply;9            (B) The Commission shall issue a final order 10        approving the application for the certificate of 11        service authority and certificate of public 12        convenience and necessity not later than 240 days 13        following the initial application; and14            (C) The Commission's final order shall explicitly 15        state that the Project is not intended for competitive 16        bidding under the SAA unless the applicant explicitly 17        requests competitive bidding in its initial 18        application.19    (d) Project Labor Agreement. Notwithstanding any other 20provision of law, the Commission shall make an explicit 21condition of any certificate of public convenience and 22necessity that any general contractor constructing any portion 23of the Project within the State must enter into one or more 24project labor agreements, as such term is defined in Section 251-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 26    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB3131- 10 -LRB104 10747 HLH 20826 b1becoming law.